California statutes. Probate Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

874.

(a) This part does not change or impair a right of a custodian or a user under a terms-of-service agreement to access and use digital assets of a user.

(b) This part does not give a fiduciary or designated recipient any new or expanded rights other than those held by the user for whom, or for whose estate or trust, the fiduciary or designated recipient acts or represents.

(c) A fiduciary’s or designated recipient’s access to digital assets may be modified or eliminated by a user, by federal law, or by a terms-of-service agreement when the user has not provided any direction that is recognized in Section
 873.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

875.

(a) When disclosing the digital assets of a user under this part, the custodian may, in its sole discretion, do any of the following:

(1) Grant the fiduciary or designated recipient full access to the user’s account.

(2) Grant the fiduciary or designated recipient partial access to the user’s account sufficient to perform the tasks with which the fiduciary or designated recipient is charged.

(3) Provide the fiduciary or designated recipient with a copy in a record of any digital asset that, on the date the custodian received the request for
 disclosure, the user could have accessed if the user were alive and had full capacity and access to the account.

(b) A custodian may assess a reasonable administrative charge for the cost of disclosing digital assets under this part.

(c) A custodian need not disclose under this part a digital asset deleted by a user.

(d) If a user directs or a fiduciary or designated recipient requests a custodian to disclose under this part some, but not all, of the user’s digital assets, the custodian need not disclose the assets if segregation of the assets would impose an undue burden on the custodian. If the custodian believes the direction or request imposes an undue burden, the custodian, fiduciary, or designated recipient
 may petition the court for an order to do any of the following:

(1) Disclose a subset limited by date of the user’s digital assets.

(2) Disclose all of the user’s digital assets to the fiduciary or designated recipient.

(3) Disclose none of the user’s digital assets.

(4) Disclose all of the user’s digital assets to the court for review in camera.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

876.

If a deceased user consented to or a court directs disclosure of the content of electronic communications of the user, the custodian shall disclose to the personal representative of the estate of the user the content of an electronic communication sent or received by the user if the personal representative gives to the custodian all of the following:

(a) A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form.

(b) A certified copy of the death certificate of the user.

(c) A certified copy of the letter of appointment of the representative, a small-estate
 affidavit under Section 13101, or court order.

(d) Unless the user provided direction using an online tool, a copy of the user’s will, trust, power of attorney, or other record evidencing the user’s consent to disclosure of the content of electronic communications.

(e) If requested by the custodian, any of the following:

(1) A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the user’s account.

(2) Evidence
 linking the account to the user.

(3) An order of the court finding any of the following:

(A) That the user had a specific account with the custodian, identifiable by the information specified in paragraph (1).

(B) That disclosure of the content of the user’s electronic communications would not violate Chapter 121 (commencing with Section 2701) of Part 1 of Title 18 of, and Section 222 of Title 47 of, the United States Code, or other applicable law.

(C) Unless the user provided direction
 using an online tool, that the user consented to disclosure of the content of electronic communications.

(D) That disclosure of the content of electronic communications of a user is reasonably necessary for estate administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

877.

Unless the user prohibited disclosure of digital assets or the court directs otherwise, a custodian shall disclose to the personal representative of the estate of a deceased user a catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by the user and digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, of the user, if the personal representative gives to the custodian all of the following:

(a) A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form.

(b) A certified copy of the death certificate of the user.

(c) A certified copy of the
 letter of appointment of the representative, a small-estate affidavit under Section 13101, or court order.

(d) If requested by the custodian, any of the following:

(1) A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the user’s account.

(2) Evidence linking the account to the user.

(3) An affidavit stating that disclosure of the user’s digital assets is reasonably necessary for estate administration.

(4) An order of the court finding either of the following:

(A) That the user had a specific account with the custodian, identifiable by the information specified in paragraph (1).

(B) That disclosure of the user’s digital assets is reasonably necessary for estate administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

878.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by the user, or provided in a trust, a custodian shall disclose to a trustee that is not an original user of an account the content of an electronic communication sent or received by an original or successor user and carried, maintained, processed, received, or stored by the custodian in the account of the trust if the trustee gives to the custodian all of the following:

(a) A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form.

(b) A certified copy of the death certificate of the settlor.

(c) A certified copy
 of the trust instrument, or a certification of trust under Section 18100.5, evidencing the settlor’s consent to disclosure of the content of electronic communications to the trustee.

(d) A certification by the trustee, under penalty of perjury, that the trust exists and that the trustee is a currently acting trustee of the trust.

(e) If requested by the custodian, any of the following:

(1) A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the trust’s account.

(2) Evidence linking the account to the trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

879.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by the user, or provided in a trust, a custodian shall disclose, to a trustee that is not an original user of an account, the catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by an original or successor user and stored, carried, or maintained by the custodian in an account of the trust and any digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, in which the trust has a right or interest if the settlor of the trust is deceased and the trustee gives the custodian all of the following:

(a) A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form.

(b) A certified copy of the death certificate of the settlor.

(c) A certified copy of the trust instrument or a certification of trust under Section 18100.5.

(d) A certification by the trustee, under penalty of perjury, that the trust exists and that the trustee is a currently acting trustee of the trust.

(e) If requested by the custodian, any of the following:

(1) A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the trust’s account.

(2) Evidence linking the account to the trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

879.1.

To the extent a power of attorney expressly grants an agent authority over the content of electronic communications sent or received by the principal, and unless directed otherwise by the principal or the court, a custodian shall disclose the content of electronic communications to the agent if the agent gives the custodian all of the following:

(a) A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form.

(b) An original or copy of the power of attorney expressly granting the agent authority over the content of electronic communications of the principal.

(c) A certification by the agent, under penalty of perjury, that the power of attorney is in effect.

(d) If requested by the custodian, either of the following:

(1) A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the principal’s account.

(2) Evidence linking the account to the principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 799, Sec. 3.   (SB 1458)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

879.2.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by the principal, or provided by a power of attorney, a custodian shall disclose to an agent with specific authority over digital assets or general authority to act on behalf of a principal a catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by the principal and digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, of the principal if the agent gives the custodian all of the following:

(a) A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form.

(b) An original or copy of the power of attorney that gives the agent specific authority over digital assets
 or general authority to act on behalf of the principal.

(c) A certification by the agent, under penalty of perjury, that the power of attorney is in effect.

(d) If requested by the custodian, either of the following:

(1) A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the principal’s account.

(2) Evidence linking the account to the principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 799, Sec. 4.   (SB 1458)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

879.3.

(a) After a noticed hearing, the court may grant a conservator access to the digital assets of a conservatee.

(b) Unless otherwise ordered by the court or directed by the user, a custodian shall disclose to a conservator the catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by a conservatee and digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, in which the conservatee has a right or interest if the conservator gives the custodian all of the following:

(1) A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form.

(2) A certified copy of the court order that gives the conservator authority over the digital assets of the conservatee.

(3) If requested by the custodian, either of the following:

(A) A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the account of the conservatee.

(B) Evidence linking the account to the conservatee.

(c) The provisions of this part are subject to Sections 2351 and 2351.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 799, Sec. 5.   (SB 1458)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

880.

(a) The legal duties imposed on a fiduciary charged with managing tangible property apply to the management of digital assets, including all of the following:

(1) The duty of care.

(2) The duty of loyalty.

(3) The duty of confidentiality.

(b) All of the following shall apply to a fiduciary’s or designated recipient’s authority with respect to a digital asset of a user:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in Section 873, a fiduciary’s or designated
 recipient’s authority is subject to the applicable terms-of-service agreement.

(2) A fiduciary’s or designated recipient’s authority is subject to other applicable law, including copyright law.

(3) A fiduciary’s authority is limited by the scope of the fiduciary’s duties.

(4) A fiduciary’s or designated recipient’s authority may not be used to impersonate the user.

(c) (1) A fiduciary with authority over the property of a decedent or settlor
 has the right of access to any digital asset in which the decedent or settlor had a right or interest that is not held by a custodian or subject to a terms-of-service agreement.

(2) This subdivision does not require a custodian to share passwords or decrypt protected devices.

(d) A fiduciary acting within the scope of the fiduciary’s duties is an authorized user of the property of the decedent, conservatee, principal, or settlor for the purpose of applicable computer-fraud and unauthorized-computer-access laws.

(e) The following shall apply to a fiduciary with authority over the tangible, personal property of a decedent, conservatee, principal, or settlor:

(1) (A) The fiduciary has the right to access the property and any digital asset stored in it.

(B) This subdivision does not require a custodian to share passwords or decrypt protected devices.

(2) The fiduciary is an authorized user for purposes of any applicable computer-fraud and unauthorized-computer-access laws.

(f) A custodian may disclose information in an account to a fiduciary of the user if the information is required to terminate an account used to access digital assets licensed to the user.

(g) A fiduciary of a
 user, or an affiant acting under Section 13101 with respect to a deceased user, may request a custodian to terminate the user’s account. A request for termination shall be in writing, in either physical or electronic form, and accompanied by all of the following:

(1) (A) If the user is deceased, a certified copy of the death certificate of the user.

(B) If the user is a conservatee, a court order authorizing the conservator to request termination of the user’s account.

(2) A certified copy of
 the letter of appointment of the representative, a small-estate affidavit under Section 13101, a court order, a power of attorney, a certified copy of the trust instrument, or a certification of the trust under Section 18100.5 giving the fiduciary authority over the account.

(3) If requested by the custodian, any of the following:

(A) A number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the user’s account.

(B) Evidence linking the account to the user.

(C) A finding by the court that the user had a specific account with the custodian, identifiable by the information specified in subparagraph
 (A).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 799, Sec. 6.   (SB 1458)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

881.

(a) Not later than 60 days after receipt of the information required under Sections 876 to 879.3, inclusive, a custodian shall comply with a request under this part from a fiduciary or designated recipient to disclose digital assets or terminate an account. If the custodian fails to comply with a request, the fiduciary or designated recipient may apply to the court for an order directing compliance.

(b) An order under subdivision (a) directing compliance shall contain a finding that compliance is not in violation of Section 2702 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(c) A custodian may notify a user that a request for disclosure of
 digital assets or to terminate an account was made pursuant to this part.

(d) A custodian may deny a request under this part from a fiduciary or designated recipient for disclosure of digital assets or to terminate an account if the custodian is aware of any lawful access to the account following the date of death of the user.

(e) This part does not limit a custodian’s ability to obtain, or to require a fiduciary or designated recipient requesting disclosure or account termination under this part to obtain, a court order that makes all of the following findings:

(1) The account belongs to the decedent, principal, conservatee, or trustee.

(2) There is
 sufficient consent from the decedent, principal,
 conservatee, or settlor to support the requested disclosure.

(3) A specific factual finding required by any other applicable law in effect at that time, including, but not limited to, a finding that disclosure is not in violation of Section 2702 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(f) (1) A custodian and its officers, employees, and agents are immune from liability for an act or omission done in good faith and in compliance with this part.

(2) The protections specified in paragraph (1) do not apply in a case of gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct of the custodian or its officers, employees, or agents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 799, Sec. 7.   (SB 1458)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

882.

This part modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c)) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

883.

Disclosure of the contents of the deceased user’s or settlor’s account to a fiduciary of the deceased user or settlor is subject to the same license, restrictions, terms of service, and legal obligations, including copyright law, that applied to the deceased user or settlor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

884.

If any provision of this part or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this part that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and, to this end, the provisions of this part are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 21. Periodic Adjustment of Dollar Amounts [890. - 890.]

890.

(a) On April 1, 2022, and at each three-year interval ending on April 1 thereafter, the dollar amounts specified in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6600) of Part 3 of Division 6 and in Division 8 (commencing with Section 13000) in effect immediately before that date shall be adjusted as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The Judicial Council shall determine the amount of the adjustment based on the change in the United States city average of the “Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,” as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, from the
 December that is 40 months prior to the adjustment to the December immediately preceding the adjustment, with each adjusted amount rounded to the nearest twenty-five dollars ($25).

(c) Beginning April 1, 2022, the Judicial Council shall, after adjusting the amounts as directed in subdivision (b), publish a list of the current dollar amounts for the provisions identified in subdivision (a), together with the date of the next scheduled adjustment.

(d) Adjustments made under subdivision (a) do not apply when the decedent’s death preceded the date of adjustment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   (AB 473)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. GENERAL PROVISIONS OF A PROCEDURAL NATURE [1000. - 1312.]



PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [1000. - 1064.]



  CHAPTER 1. Rules of Practice [1000. - 1004.]

1000.

(a) Except to the extent that this code provides applicable rules, the rules of practice applicable to civil actions, including discovery proceedings and proceedings under Title 3a (commencing with Section 391) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, apply to, and constitute the rules of practice in, proceedings under this code. All issues of fact joined in probate proceedings shall be tried in conformity with the rules of practice in civil actions.

(b) For purposes of determining when a petitioner in a proceeding under this code may commence discovery as to nonparties, the time periods set forth in the Civil Discovery Act (Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure) shall apply, except that the time periods shall commence to run upon service of the petition and notice of hearing upon all parties entitled to notice. Nothing in this subdivision shall either alter when a
 respondent in such a proceeding may commence discovery or increase the extent to which nonparties may be subject to discovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 32, Sec. 3.   (AB 308)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.

(a) The Judicial Council may provide by rule for the practice and procedure under this code. Unless disapproved by the Judicial Council, a court may provide by local rule for the practice and procedure under this code. Judicial Council and local court rules shall be consistent with the applicable statutes. 

(b) The Judicial Council may prescribe the form of the applications, notices, orders, and other documents required by this code. Any form prescribed by the Judicial Council is deemed to comply with this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.

Unless it is otherwise provided by this code or by rules adopted by the Judicial Council, either the superior court or the court on appeal may, in its discretion, order costs to be paid by any party to the proceedings, or out of the assets of the estate, as justice may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.

(a) The court may, on its own motion or on request of a personal representative, guardian, conservator, trustee, or other interested person, appoint a guardian ad litem at any stage of a proceeding under this code to represent the interest of any of the following persons, if the court determines that representation of the interest otherwise would be inadequate:

(1) A minor.

(2) A person who lacks legal capacity to make decisions.

(3) An unborn beneficiary.

(4) An unascertained person.

(5) A person whose identity or address is unknown.

(6) A designated class of persons who are not ascertained or are not in being.

(b) If not precluded by a conflict of interest, a guardian ad litem may be appointed to represent several persons or interests.

(c) The reasonable expenses of the guardian ad litem, including compensation and attorney’s fees, shall be determined by the court and paid as the court orders, either out of the property of the estate involved or by the petitioner or from any other source as the court orders.

(d) Before a court appoints a guardian ad litem pursuant to this chapter, a proposed guardian ad litem shall disclose both of the following to the court and all parties to the action or proceeding:

(1) Any known actual or potential conflicts of interest that would or might arise from the appointment.

(2) Any familial or affiliate relationship the proposed guardian ad litem has with any of the parties.

(e) If a guardian ad litem becomes aware that a potential conflict of interest has become an actual conflict of interest or that a new potential or actual conflict of interest exists, the guardian ad litem shall promptly disclose the conflict of interest to the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 20.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.5.

The public guardian shall not be appointed as a guardian ad litem pursuant to Section 1003 unless the court, after reasonable notice and inquiry, finds that no other qualified person is willing to act as a guardian ad litem.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1004.

If a proceeding under this code affects the title to or the right of possession of real property, notice of the pendency of the proceeding may be filed pursuant to Title 4.5 (commencing with Section 405) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 32, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Petitions and Other Papers [1020. - 1023.]

1020.

Except as provided in Section 1023, a petition, objection, response, report, or account filed pursuant to this code shall be in writing, signed by all of the petitioners, objectors, or respondents or by all of the persons making the report or account, and filed with the court clerk. Verification of a document shall constitute signature of that document, unless expressly provided to the contrary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 871, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.

(a) All of the following shall be verified:

(1) A petition, report, or account filed pursuant to this code.

(2) An objection or response filed pursuant to this code to a petition, report, or account.

(b) Except as provided in Section 1023, the verification shall be made as follows:

(1) A petition shall be verified by the petitioner or, if there are two or more parties joining in the petition, by any of them.

(2) A report or account shall be verified by the person who has the duty to make the report or account or, if there are two or more persons having a duty to make the report or account, by any of them.

(3) An objection or response shall be verified by the objector or respondent or, if there are two or more parties joining in the objection or response, by any of them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1022.

An affidavit or verified petition shall be received as evidence when offered in an uncontested proceeding under this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1023.

If a petitioner, objector, or respondent is absent from the county or for some other cause is unable to sign or verify a petition, objection, or response filed pursuant to this code, the person’s attorney may sign or verify the petition, objection, or response unless the person is a fiduciary appointed in the proceeding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Hearings and Orders [1040. - 1051.]

1040.

This chapter governs the hearing of all matters under this code, except where the statute that provides for the hearing of the matter prescribes a different procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1041.

When a petition, report, account, or other matter that requires a hearing is filed with the court clerk, the clerk shall set the matter for hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1042.

A hearing under this code shall be on notice unless the statute that provides for the hearing dispenses with notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1043.

(a) An interested person may appear and make a response or objection in writing at or before the hearing.

(b) An interested person may appear and make a response or objection orally at the hearing. The court in its discretion shall either hear and determine the response or objection at the hearing, or grant a continuance for the purpose of allowing a response or objection to be made in writing.

(c) A request for a continuance for the purpose of making a written response or objection shall not itself be considered as a response or objection, nor shall the failure to make a response or objection during the time allowed be considered as a response or objection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1044.

The petitioner or other party affirming is the plaintiff and the party objecting or responding is the defendant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1045.

The court may continue or postpone any hearing, from time to time, in the interest of justice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1046.

The court shall hear and determine any matter at issue and any response or objection presented, consider evidence presented, and make appropriate orders.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1047.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, an order made in a proceeding under this code need not recite the existence of facts, or the performance of acts, upon which jurisdiction depends, but need only contain the matters ordered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1048.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), orders shall be either entered at length in the minute book of the court or signed by the judge and filed. 

(b) An order for distribution shall be entered at length in a judgment book or other permanent record of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1049.

An order may be enforced as provided in Title 9 (commencing with Section 680.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.

The judgment roll in a proceeding under this code consists of the following papers, where applicable:

(a) In all cases:

(1) The petition, application, report, or account that initiates a particular proceeding.

(2) Any order directing notice of the hearing to be given.

(3) Any notice of the hearing, and any order to show cause made in the proceeding, with the affidavits showing publication, posting, or delivery pursuant to Section 1215 of the notice or order as may be required by law or
 court order.

(4) Any citation, in case no answer or written opposition is filed by a party entitled, by law or court order, to notice of the proceeding by citation, with the affidavit or proof of service and, if service of the citation is made by publication, the affidavit of publication and the order directing publication.

(5) Any finding of the court or referee in the proceeding.

(6) The order or statement of decision made in the proceeding.

(7) Any letters, as defined in Section 52.

(b) If an answer, demurrer, written opposition, or counter petition is filed in a proceeding:

(1) Pleadings and papers in the nature of pleadings.

(2) Any orders striking out a pleading in whole or in part.

(3) Any order made on demurrer, or relating to a change of parties, in the proceeding.

(4) The verdict of the jury, if any.

(c) If the proceeding is for the probate of a will, the will.

(d) If the proceeding is a contest of a will, for the revocation of the probate of a will, or for a preliminary or final distribution of the estate under a will:

(1) The will.

(2) The order admitting the will to probate.

(e) If the proceeding is for the settlement of the final account of a personal representative or for the final distribution of an estate, the affidavit showing publication of notice to creditors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 13.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1051.

(a) In the absence of a stipulation to the contrary between parties who have filed pleadings in a proceeding under this code, there shall be no ex parte communications between any party, or attorney for the party, and the court concerning a subject raised in those pleadings, except as permitted or required by law.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in any case upon which the court has exercised its jurisdiction, the court may refer to the court investigator or take other appropriate action in response to an ex parte communication regarding either or both of the following:

(1) A fiduciary, as defined in Section 39, about the
 fiduciary’s performance of their duties and responsibilities.

(2) A person who is the subject of a conservatorship or guardianship proceeding under Division 4 (commencing with Section 1400).

(c) An action by the court pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be consistent with due process and the requirements of this code. The court shall disclose the ex parte communication to all parties and counsel. The court may, for good cause, dispense with the disclosure if necessary to protect the ward or conservatee from harm.

(d) If the court imposes a penalty, including, but not limited to, a surcharge, punishment for contempt, suspension, or removal, on a professional fiduciary, the court shall report that action to the
 Professional Fiduciaries Bureau. If the court reports an action taken under this section, the court shall provide the bureau, at no charge, with access to the information, including confidential information, regarding its investigation of the professional fiduciary contained in the court records. The bureau shall maintain the confidentiality of the information, as required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 6580 of the Business and Professions Code or any other applicable state or federal law.

(e) A superior court shall not be required to perform any duties imposed by this section until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 3.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Accounts [1060. - 1064.]

1060.

This chapter governs all accounts to be filed with the court. Except as specifically provided elsewhere in this code, or unless good cause is shown therefore, no information in addition to that required in this chapter need be in an account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 724, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1060.5.

This chapter shall be operative on and after July 1, 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (July 1, 1997) for Chapter 4, commencing with Section 1060.)
-------------------------------------------

1061.

(a) All accounts shall state the period covered by the account and contain a summary showing all of the following, to the extent applicable:

(1) The property on hand at the beginning of the period covered by the account, which shall be the value of the property initially received by the fiduciary if this is the first account, and shall be the property on hand at the end of the prior account if this is a subsequent account.

(2) The value of any assets received during the period of the accounting which are not assets on hand as of the commencement of the administration of an estate.

(3) The amount of any receipts of income or principal, excluding items listed under paragraphs (1) and (2) or receipts from a trade or business.

(4) Net income from a trade or business.

(5) Gains on sales.

(6) The amount of disbursements, excluding disbursements for a trade or business or distributions.

(7) Loss on sales.

(8) Net loss from trade or business.

(9) Distributions to
 beneficiaries, the ward or conservatee.

(10) Property on hand at the end of the accounting period, stated at its carry value.

(b) The summary shall be in a format substantially the same as the following, except that inapplicable categories need not be shown:SUMMARY OF ACCOUNTCHARGES:Property on hand at beginning of
account (or Inventories)
$
Additional property received (or
Supplemental Inventories)
Receipts (Schedule ______)Gains on Sale or Other Disposition
(Schedule _______)
Net income from trade or business
(Schedule_______)Total Charges:$CREDITS:Disbursements (Schedule _______)$Losses on Sale or Other Disposition
(Schedule _______)Net loss from trade or business
(Schedule
 ______)Distributions (Schedule ______)Property on hand at close of account
(Schedule ______)Total Credits:$(c) Total charges shall equal total credits.

(d) For purposes of this section, the terms “net income” and “net loss” shall be utilized in accordance with general accounting principles. Nothing in this section is intended to require that the preparation of the summary must include “net income” and “net loss” as reflected in the tax returns governing the period of the account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 724, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1062.

The summary shall be supported by detailed schedules showing the following:

(a) Receipts, showing the nature or purpose of each item, the source of the receipt, and the date thereof.

(b) Disbursement, including the nature or purpose of each item, the name of the payee, and the date thereof.

(c) Net income or loss from a trade or business, which shall be sufficient if it
 provides the information disclosed on Schedule C or F of the federal income tax return.

(d) Calculation of gains or losses on sale or other disposition.

(e) Distributions of cash or property to beneficiaries, ward or conservatee, showing the date and amount of each, with the distribution of property shown at its carry value.

(f) Itemized list of property on hand, describing each item at its carry value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 1060.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.

(a) In all accounts, there shall be an additional schedule showing the estimated market value of the assets on hand as of the end of the accounting period, and a schedule of the estimated market value of the assets on hand as of the beginning of the accounting period for all accounts subsequent to the initial account. The requirement of an estimated value of real estate, a closely held business, or other assets without a ready market, may be satisfied by a good faith estimate by the fiduciary.

(b) If there were purchases or other changes in the form of assets occurring during the period of the account, there shall be a schedule showing these transactions. However, no reporting is required for transfers between cash or accounts in a financial institution or money market mutual funds as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 8901.

(c) If an estate of a decedent or a trust will be distributed to an income beneficiary, there shall be a schedule showing an allocation of receipts and disbursements between principal and income.
